Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 11. Derivative Actions.

§79-29-1101.
Right to bring action.

A member or an owner of a financial interest may bring an action in chancery court in the right of a limited liability company to recover a judgment in its favor if managers or members with authority to do so have refused to bring the action or if an effort to cause those managers or members to bring the action is not likely to succeed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 77; Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-1101 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 77, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to members who may commence or maintain a derivative proceeding. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1103.

§79-29-1102.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-1102. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 78, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-1102 was entitled: Demand.

§79-29-1103.
Proper plaintiff.

In a derivative action, the plaintiff must be a member or an owner of a financial interest at the time of bringing the action and:

At the time of the transaction of which the plaintiff complains; or

The plaintiff’s status as a member or an owner of a financial interest had devolved upon the plaintiff by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of an operating agreement from a person who was a member or an owner of a financial interest at the time of the transaction.

A plaintiff may not commence or maintain a derivative proceeding unless the plaintiff fairly and adequately represents the interests of the limited liability company in enforcing the right of the limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 79; Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-1103 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 79, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related stay of proceedings. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1107.

§79-29-1104.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-1104. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 80, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-1104 was entitled: Dismissal. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1109.

§79-29-1105.
Complaint.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall set forth with particularity the effort, if any, of the plaintiff to secure initiation of the action by a manager or member pursuant to Section 79-29-1101 or the reasons for not making the effort.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 81; Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-1105 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 81, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to discontinuance or settlement. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1111.

Jurisdiction in derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign limited liability company for matters covered by this section, see § 79-29-1115.

§79-29-1106.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-1106. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 82, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-1106 was entitled: Payment of expenses. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1113.

§79-29-1107.
Stay of proceedings.

If the limited liability company commences an inquiry into the allegations made in the complaint, the court may stay any derivative proceeding for such period as the court deems appropriate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 83; Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-1107 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 83, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to applicability to foreign limited liability companies. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-1115.

Jurisdiction in derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign limited liability company for matters covered by this section, see § 79-29-1115.

§79-29-1109.
Dismissal.

A derivative proceeding shall be dismissed by the court on motion by the limited liability company if one of the groups specified in subsection (2) or (6) of this section has determined in good faith, after conducting a reasonable inquiry upon which its conclusions are based, that the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is not in the best interests of the limited liability company.

Unless a panel is appointed pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the determination in subsection (1) of this section shall be made by one (1) of the following:

A majority vote of independent managers present at a meeting of managers if independent managers constitute a majority of all managers;

A majority vote of independent members at a meeting of the members, whether or not such independent members constituted a majority of all members; or

A majority vote of a committee consisting of two (2) or more independent managers appointed by the majority vote of independent managers present at a meeting of managers, whether or not such independent managers constituted a majority of all managers.

None of the following shall by itself cause a manager or member to be considered not independent for purposes of this section:

The nomination or election of the manager by persons who are defendants in the derivative proceeding or against whom action is demanded;

The naming of the manager or member as a defendant in the derivative proceeding or as a person against whom action is demanded; or

The approval by the manager or member of the act being challenged in the derivative proceeding if the act resulted in no personal benefit to the manager or member.

If a derivative proceeding is commenced after a determination has been made rejecting a demand by a member, the complaint shall allege with particularity facts establishing either:

That a majority of the persons making the determination under subsection (2) of this section were not independent at the time the determination was made; or

That the requirements of subsection (1) of this section have not been met.

If the determination in subsection (1) of this section is made by a committee pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section and a majority of managers are not independent at the time the determination is made, or if the determination in subsection (1) is made by the members pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section and a majority of the members are not independent at the time the determination is made, then the limited liability company shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (1) have been met.In all other cases, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (1) of this section have not been met.

The court may appoint a panel of one or more independent persons upon motion by the limited liability company to make a determination whether the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is in the best interests of the limited liability company.In such case, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (1) of this section have not been met.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1111.
Discontinuance or settlement.

A derivative proceeding may not be discontinued or settled without the court’s approval.If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will substantially affect the interests of the limited liability company’s members or a class of members, the court shall direct that notice be given to the members affected.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Jurisdiction in derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign limited liability company for matters covered by this section, see § 79-29-1115.

§79-29-1113.
Payment of expenses.

If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, as a result of a judgment, compromise or settlement of any such action, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, from any recovery in any such action or from a limited liability company.

On termination of the derivative proceeding the court may order the plaintiff to pay any defendant’s reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred in defending the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding was commenced or maintained without reasonable cause or for an improper purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1115.
Applicability to foreign limited liability companies.

In any derivative proceeding brought in the courts of this state in the right of a foreign limited liability company, the matters covered by this article shall be governed by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.